Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.240

Existing systems preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall repeal, supersede, alter, amend or be regarded as a substitute for any existing retirement or pension system, duly established by city ordinance.

[ 1939 c 207 s 28; RRS s 9592-128.]